Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Funding of Salaries and Expenses of Youth Counsellors and Clerk-Reporters

§§ 43-21-1 through 43-21-43.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§43-21-1. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 29]

§43-21-3. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 348]

§43-21-5. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 474, § 1]

§43-21-7. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 3; Laws, 1964, ch. 371, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1966, ch. 377, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 391, §§ 1, 2]

§43-21-9. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 4]

§43-21-11. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 377, § 3; Laws, 1973, ch. 469, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch 494, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 474, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 471, § 1]

§43-21-13. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 6; Laws, 1966, ch. 377, § 4]

§43-21-15. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 7]

§43-21-17. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 8; Laws, 1973, ch. 469, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 494, § 3]

§43-21-19. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 9; Laws, 1964, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 377, § 5]

§43-21-21. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 10]

§43-21-23. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 11]

§43-21-25. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 12; Laws, 1966, ch. 377, § 6]

§43-21-27. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 13; Laws, 1966, ch. 377, § 7; Laws, 1973, ch. 469, § 3; Laws, 1975, ch. 494, § 4]

§43-21-29. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 14; Laws, 1960, ch. 281; Laws, 1964, ch. 373; Laws, 1973, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 406]

§43-21-31. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 15]

§43-21-33. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 16; Laws, 1958, ch. 236; Laws, 1966, ch. 377, § 8; Laws, 1973, ch. 488, § 1]

§§43-21-35 through43-21-39. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, §§ 17-19]

§43-21-41. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 20]

§43-21-43. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 21]

§ 43-21-45.
Funds for payment of salaries and expenses of youth counsellors and clerk-reporters.

In any Class 1 county having a total population in excess of eighty thousand (80,000) according to the 1950 census and having a total assessed valuation in excess of Forty-eight Million Dollars ($48,000,000.00), and in which there is both a youth court and a federal military base or encampment; and in any Class 1 county having a total population in excess of fifty-two thousand seven hundred twenty (52,720) in the 1960 federal decennial census and in which there is located both a state-supported university and a Mississippi National Guard Camp, the board of supervisors of any such county may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries and/or travel expenses of a youth counsellor, or counsellors, and the salary of a clerk-reporter of the youth court of such county, and such funds shall be expended for no other purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7185-21.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 207, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1968, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 28, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§§ 43-21-47 through 43-21-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by Law, 1979, ch. 506, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§43-21-47. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 22]

§43-21-49. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 23; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 68]

§43-21-51. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 24]

§43-21-53. [Laws, 1940, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 25]

§43-21-55. [Laws, 1946, ch. 207, § 26]